New Jersey, session 222, A2887.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 7.1 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-12) is amended to read as follows: 7.1.  Notice pursuant to subsections a., b.,[d.], c., e., f., g. [and] h. and i of this section shall be given by the applicant unless a particular municipal officer is so designated by ordinance; provided that nothing contained herein shall prevent the applicant from giving such notice if [he] the applicant so desires.  [Notice] Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, notice required pursuant to subsections a., b., [d.], c., e., f., g. [and] h. and i. of this section shall be given at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing. a.     Public notice of a hearing shall be given for an extension of approvals for five or more years under subsection d. of section 37 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-49) and subsection b. of section 40 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-52); for modification or elimination of a significant condition or conditions in a memorializing resolution in any situation wherein the application for development for which the memorializing resolution is proposed for adoption required public notice, and for any other applications for development, with the following exceptions: (1) conventional site plan review pursuant to section 34 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-46), (2) minor subdivisions pursuant to section 35 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-47) or (3) final approval pursuant to section 38 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-50); notwithstanding the foregoing, the governing body may by ordinance require public notice for such categories of site plan review as may be specified by ordinance, for appeals of determinations of administrative officers pursuant to subsection a. of section 57 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-70), and for requests for interpretation pursuant to subsection b. of section 57 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-70).  Public notice shall also be given in the event that relief is requested pursuant to section 47 or 63 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-60 or C.40:55D-76) as part of an application for development otherwise excepted herein from public notice. In addition, public notice shall be given by a public entity seeking to erect an outdoor advertising sign on land owned or controlled by a public entity as required pursuant to section 22 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-31) or, if so provided by ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection g. of section 29.1 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-39), by a private entity seeking to erect an outdoor advertising sign on public land or on land owned by a private entity. Public notice shall be given by publication in the official newspaper of the municipality, if there be one, or in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. b.    (1)  Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection or paragraph (2) of subsection [h.] i of this section, notice of a hearing requiring public notice pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be given to the owners of all real property, as shown on the current tax duplicates, located in the State and within 200 feet in all directions of the property which is the subject of such hearing [; provided that this requirement]. (2)  (a)  Notice of a hearing requiring public notice pursuant to subsection a. of this section proposing the development of a warehouse greater than 100,000 square feet or high-density development shall be given at least 20 days prior to the hearing by the municipal clerk to: (i)  the owners of all real property located within the municipality that is the site of the proposed development; and (ii)  if the proposed development of a warehouse or high-density development is located within 300 feet of the municipal boundary, to the owners of all real property located within a municipality that is adjacent to the municipality that is the site of the proposed development; and (iii)  if the proposed development of a warehouse or high-density development is located within an area designated pursuant to P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et seq.) as Planning Area 4A (Rural Planning Area) and within 1,000 feet of the municipal boundary, to the owners of all real property located within a municipality that is adjacent to the municipality that is the site of the proposed development. (b)  As used in this subsection, high-density development means development proposed at a greater concentration of density or intensity of land use than authorized within the area, section, or sections, under the current master plan and development regulations. c.  (1)  The provision of notice under this section shall be deemed satisfied by notice to the [(1)] condominium association, in the case of any unit owner whose unit has a unit above or below it, or [(2)] horizontal property regime, in the case of any co-owner whose apartment has an apartment above or below it.  Notice shall be given by: [(1)] serving a copy thereof on the property owner as shown on the said current tax duplicate, or [his] the property owners agent in charge of the property, or [(2)] mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the property owner at [his] the property owners address as shown on the said current tax duplicate. (2)  Notice to a partnership owner may be made by service upon any partner.  Notice to a corporate owner may be made by service upon its president, a vice president, secretary or other person authorized by appointment or by law to accept service on behalf of the corporation.  Notice to a condominium association, horizontal property regime, community trust or homeowners' association, because of its ownership of common elements or areas located within [200 feet of] : (i)  a distance from the property which is the subject of the hearing, as specified in subsection b. of this section, or (ii)  the municipality that is the site of the proposed development or a municipality that is adjacent to the municipality that is the site of the proposed development, as specified in subsection b. of this section, may be made in the same manner as to a corporation without further notice to unit owners, co-owners, or homeowners on account of such common elements or areas. [c.]  d.       Upon the written request of an applicant, the administrative officer of a municipality shall, within seven days, make and certify a list from said current tax duplicates of names and addresses of owners to whom the applicant is required to give notice pursuant to [subsection b. and c. of] this section.  In addition, the administrative officer shall include on the list the names, addresses and positions of those persons who, not less than seven days prior to the date on which the applicant requested the list, have registered to receive notice pursuant to subsection [i.] of this section.  The applicant shall be entitled to rely upon the information contained in such list, and failure to give notice to any owner, to any public utility, cable television company, or local utility or to any military facility commander not on the list shall not invalidate any hearing or proceeding.  A sum not to exceed $0.25 per name [, or $10.00, whichever is greater,] may be charged for such list. [d.]  e.       Notice of hearings on applications for development involving property located within 200 feet of an adjoining municipality shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the clerk of such municipality. [e.]  f.        Notice shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the county planning board of a hearing on an application for development of property adjacent to an existing county road or proposed road shown on the official county map or on the county master plan, adjoining other county land or situated within 200 feet of a municipal boundary. [f.]  g.        Notice shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the Commissioner of Transportation of a hearing on an application for development of property adjacent to a State highway. [g.]  h.       Notice shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the State Planning Commission of a hearing on an application for development of property which exceeds 150 acres or 500 dwelling units.  The notice shall include a copy of any maps or documents required to be on file with the municipal clerk pursuant to subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-10). [h.]  i.        Notice of hearings on applications for approval of a major subdivision or a site plan not defined as a minor site plan under this act requiring public notice pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be given: (1) in the case of a public utility, cable television company or local utility which possesses a right-of-way or easement within the municipality and which has registered with the municipality in accordance with section 5 of P.L.1991, c.412 (C.40:55D-12.1), by (i) serving a copy of the notice on the person whose name appears on the registration form on behalf of the public utility, cable television company or local utility or (ii) mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the person whose name appears on the registration form at the address shown on that form; (2) in the case of a military facility which has registered with the municipality and which is situated within 3,000 feet in all directions of the property which is the subject of the hearing, by (i) serving a copy of the notice on the military facility commander whose name appears on the registration form or (ii) mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the military facility commander at the address shown on that form. [i.]  j.         The applicant shall file an affidavit of proof of service with the municipal agency holding the hearing on the application for development in the event that the applicant is required to give notice pursuant to this section. [j.]  k.        Notice pursuant to subsections [d.], e., f., g. [and] h. and i. of this section shall not be deemed to be required, unless public notice pursuant to subsection a. and notice pursuant to subsection b. of this section are required. (cf: P.L.2005, c.41, s.3) 2.  Section 7 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-7) is amended to read as follows: 7. a. No redevelopment project shall be undertaken or carried out except in accordance with a redevelopment plan adopted by ordinance of the municipal governing body, upon its finding that the specifically delineated project area is located in an area in need of redevelopment or in an area in need of rehabilitation, or in both, according to criteria set forth in section 5 or section 14 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-5 or 40A:12A-14), as appropriate. The redevelopment plan shall include an outline for the planning, development, redevelopment, or rehabilitation of the project area sufficient to indicate: (1)   Its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses, density of population, and improved traffic and public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities and other public improvements. (2)   Proposed land uses and building requirements in the project area. (3)   Adequate provision for the temporary and permanent relocation, as necessary, of residents in the project area, including an estimate of the extent to which decent, safe and sanitary dwelling units affordable to displaced residents will be available to them in the existing local housing market. (4)   An identification of any property within the redevelopment area which is proposed to be acquired in accordance with the redevelopment plan. (5)   Any significant relationship of the redevelopment plan to (a) the master plans of contiguous municipalities, (b) the master plan of the county in which the municipality is located, and (c) the State Development and Redevelopment Plan adopted pursuant to the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.). (6)   As of the date of the adoption of the resolution finding the area to be in need of redevelopment, an inventory of all housing units affordable to low and moderate income households, as defined pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304), that are to be removed as a result of implementation of the redevelopment plan, whether as a result of subsidies or market conditions, listed by affordability level, number of bedrooms, and tenure. (7)   A plan for the provision, through new construction or substantial rehabilitation of one comparable, affordable replacement housing unit for each affordable housing unit that has been occupied at any time within the last 18 months, that is subject to affordability controls and that is identified as to be removed as a result of implementation of the redevelopment plan.  Displaced residents of housing units provided under any State or federal housing subsidy program, or pursuant to the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), provided they are deemed to be eligible, shall have first priority for those replacement units provided under the plan; provided that any such replacement unit shall not be credited against a prospective municipal obligation under the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), if the housing unit which is removed had previously been credited toward satisfying the municipal fair share obligation.  To the extent reasonably feasible, replacement housing shall be provided within or in close proximity to the redevelopment area.  A municipality shall report annually to the Department of Community Affairs on its progress in implementing the plan for provision of comparable, affordable replacement housing required pursuant to this section. (8)   Proposed locations for zero-emission vehicle fueling and charging infrastructure within the project area in a manner that appropriately connects with an essential public charging network. b.    A redevelopment plan may include the provision of affordable housing in accordance with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) and the housing element of the municipal master plan. c.     (1)  The redevelopment plan shall describe its relationship to pertinent municipal development regulations as defined in the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.).  The redevelopment plan shall supersede applicable provisions of the development regulations of the municipality or constitute an overlay zoning district within the redevelopment area.  When the redevelopment plan supersedes any provision of the development regulations, the ordinance adopting the redevelopment plan shall contain an explicit amendment to the zoning district map included in the zoning ordinance.  The zoning district map as amended shall indicate the redevelopment area to which the redevelopment plan applies.  Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.) or of other law, no notice beyond that required for adoption of ordinances by the municipality shall be required for the hearing on or adoption of the redevelopment plan or subsequent amendments thereof, unless the redevelopment plan or subsequent amendments thereof authorizes the development of a warehouse greater than 100,000 square feet or high-density development.  If a redevelopment plan or subsequent amendments thereof authorizes the development of a warehouse greater than 100,000 square feet or high-density development, notice shall be given at least 20 days prior to the hearing by the municipal clerk to the owners of all real property, as shown on the current tax duplicates, located within the municipality; and, if the proposed development of a warehouse or high-density development is located within 300 feet of the municipal boundary, to the owners of all real property located within a municipality that is adjacent to the municipality that is the site of the proposed development, however  if the proposed development of a warehouse or high-density development is located within an area designated pursuant to P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et seq.) as Planning Area 4A (Rural Planning Area) and within 300 feet of the municipal boundary, to the owners of all real property located within 1,000 feet of the site of the proposed development. (2)  A municipality or designated redevelopment entity, which provides notice of the hearing on or adoption of a redevelopment plan, or subsequent amendments thereof, authorizing the development of a warehouse greater than 100,000 square feet or high-density development, may negotiate and collect revenue from a redeveloper to recover the costs of providing such notice. (3)  As used in this subsection, high-density development means development proposed at a greater concentration of density or intensity of land use than authorized within the area, section, or sections, under the current master plan and development regulations. d.    All provisions of the redevelopment plan shall be either substantially consistent with the municipal master plan or designed to effectuate the master plan; but the municipal governing body may adopt a redevelopment plan which is inconsistent with or not designed to effectuate the master plan by affirmative vote of a majority of its full authorized membership with the reasons for so acting set forth in the redevelopment plan. e.     Prior to the adoption of a redevelopment plan, or revision or amendment thereto, the planning board shall transmit to the governing body, within 45 days after referral, a report containing its recommendation concerning the redevelopment plan.  This report shall include an identification of any provisions in the proposed redevelopment plan which are inconsistent with the master plan and recommendations concerning these inconsistencies and any other matters as the board deems appropriate. The governing body, when considering the adoption of a redevelopment plan or revision or amendment thereof, shall review the report of the planning board and may approve or disapprove or change any recommendation by a vote of a majority of its full authorized membership and shall record in its minutes the reasons for not following the recommendations.  Failure of the planning board to transmit its report within the required 45 days shall relieve the governing body from the requirements of this subsection with regard to the pertinent proposed redevelopment plan or revision or amendment thereof.  Nothing in this subsection shall diminish the applicability of the provisions of subsection d. of this section with respect to any redevelopment plan or revision or amendment thereof. f.     The governing body of a municipality may direct the planning board to prepare a redevelopment plan or an amendment or revision to a redevelopment plan for a designated redevelopment area.  After completing the redevelopment plan, the planning board shall transmit the proposed plan to the governing body for its adoption.  The governing body, when considering the proposed plan, may amend or revise any portion of the proposed redevelopment plan by an affirmative vote of the majority of its full authorized membership and shall record in its minutes the reasons for each amendment or revision.  When a redevelopment plan or amendment to a redevelopment plan is referred to the governing body by the planning board under this subsection, the governing body shall be relieved of the referral requirements of subsection e. of this section. (cf: P.L.2021, c.168, s.2) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.